Utah statutes.
17-36-47.   Reserve fund for capital improvements -- Estimate of amount required -- Tax levy -- Accumulation from year to year -- Restriction on use.

(1)  Subject to Subsection (4) the legislative body of a county that has established a reserve fund under Section 17-36-46 may:

(a)  include in the annual budget or estimate of amounts required to meet the public expenses of the county for the ensuing year such sum as it considers necessary for the uses and purposes of the fund; and

(b)  include those amounts in the annual tax levy of the county.

(2)  Subject to Subsection (4), the money in the fund shall be allowed to accumulate from year to year until the county legislative body determines to spend any money in the fund for the purpose specified.

(3)  Subject to Subsection (4), money in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall remain in the fund as surplus available for future use, and may not be transferred to any other fund or used for any other purpose.

(4)  The amount of money in a reserve fund established under Section 17-36-46 may not exceed .6% of the taxable value of the county.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 133, 2000 General Session

